Ohio, session 136, HB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5747.98 be amended and section 5
5747.74 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5747.74. (A) As used in this section : 7
(1) "Employee donor" means an employee who, while living, 8
donates all or part of such person's liver, pancreas, kidney, 9
intestine, lung, or bone marrow in accordance with the "National 10
Organ Transplant Act," 42 U.S.C. 273, et seq. 11
(2) "Qualifying employer" means a taxpayer or a pass- 12
through entity who is registered and authorized to use the e- 13
verify federal employment verification program jointly 14
administered by the United States department of homeland 15
security and the social security administration under 8 U.S.C. 16
1324a, or any of its successor programs. 17

H. B. No. 122 Page 2
As Passed by the House
(3) "Donation leave benefits" means compensation paid to 18
an employee donor while the employee is on leave for a period 19
that is medically necessary for such employee to recover from 20
the employee's living donation, provided that the compensation 21
is equal to the compensation the employee would have received if 22
the employee had worked for the qualifying employer in the 23
employee's job for that period and is paid as part of a policy 24
of the employer for living donation that does not deduct time 25
from the employee's other paid leave time. 26
(B)(1) There is hereby allowed a nonrefundable credit 27
against a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability for a taxpayer who 28
is a qualifying employer, or who owns a direct or indirect 29
interest in a qualifying employer, that paid donation leave 30
benefits to an employee donor. The total credit available with 31
respect to an employee donor for each living donation shall 32
equal the lesser of the amount of donation leave benefits paid 33
to the employee or three hundred dollars for each day of 34
donation leave benefits paid, provided that the credit shall not 35
be allowed for more than thirty days of donation leave benefits 36
paid. 37
In the case of a taxpayer who is a qualifying employer, 38
the credit shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the 39
donation leave benefits are paid. If a taxpayer holds a direct 40
or indirect equity interest in a qualifying employer that paid 41
donation leave benefits, the taxpayer shall claim the taxpayer's 42
distributive or proportionate share of the credit for the 43
taxpayer's taxable year that includes the last day of the 44
entity's taxable year. 45
The total amount of donation leave benefits paid by a 46
qualifying employer and eligible for the credit allowed under 47

H. B. No. 122 Page 3
As Passed by the House
this section per taxable year shall not exceed fifty four 48
thousand dollars. 49
(C) The credit shall be claimed in the order required 50
under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. Any credit amount in 51
excess of the aggregate amount of tax due under section 5747.02 52
of the Revised Code, after allowing for any other credits 53
preceding the credit in that order, may be carried forward for 54
three taxable years, but the amount of the excess credit allowed 55
in any such year shall be deducted from the balance carried 56
forward to the next year. 57
(D) On or before the first day of September of the year 58
following the effective date of the enactment of this section, 59
and on the first day of each September thereafter, the tax 60
commissioner shall issue a report regarding the credit 61
authorized under this section to the chairpersons of the 62
standing committees of the house of representatives and senate 63
that deal primarily with taxation. The report shall include, for 64
the preceding taxable year, the total number of taxpayers that 65
claimed a credit under this section and the total value of all 66
credits earned and all credits claimed. 67
(E) The tax commissioner may require a taxpayer to furnish 68
any information necessary to support a claim for a credit under 69
this section, including the taxpayer's living donation leave 70
policy and pay stubs for the employee donor or a signed 71
attestation from the employee donor providing the date of the 72
donation and the period of time for which leave from work was 73
prescribed as medically necessary. The commissioner may adopt 74
any rules necessary to administer this section. 75
Sec. 5747.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 76
calculating a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 77

H. B. No. 122 Page 4
As Passed by the House
5747.02 of the Revised Code, a taxpayer shall claim any credits 78
to which the taxpayer is entitled in the following order: 79
Either the retirement income credit under division (B) of 80
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum retirement 81
income credits under divisions (C), (D), and (E) of that 82
section; 83
Either the senior citizen credit under division (F) of 84
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum 85
distribution credit under division (G) of that section; 86
The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of the 87
Revised Code; 88
The credit for displaced workers who pay for job training 89
under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; 90
The campaign contribution credit under section 5747.29 of 91
the Revised Code; 92
The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under section 93
5747.022 of the Revised Code; 94
The joint filing credit under division (G)(E) of section 95
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 96
The earned income credit under section 5747.71 of the 97
Revised Code; 98
The nonrefundable credit for education expenses under 99
section 5747.72 of the Revised Code; 100
The nonrefundable credit for donations to scholarship 101
granting organizations under section 5747.73 of the Revised 102
Code; 103
The nonrefundable credit for tuition paid to a 104

H. B. No. 122 Page 5
As Passed by the House
nonchartered nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the 105
Revised Code; 106
The nonrefundable vocational job credit under section 107
5747.057 of the Revised Code; 108
The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) 109
of section 5747.058 of the Revised Code; 110
The enterprise zone credit under section 5709.66 of the 111
Revised Code; 112
The credit for beginning farmers who participate in a 113
financial management program under division (B) of section 114
5747.77 of the Revised Code; 115
The credit for organ donation leave benefits under section 116
5747.74 of the Revised Code; 117
The credit for commercial vehicle operator training 118
expenses under section 5747.82 of the Revised Code; 119
The nonrefundable welcome home Ohio (WHO) program credit 120
under section 122.633 of the Revised Code; 121
The credit for selling or renting agricultural assets to 122
beginning farmers under division (A) of section 5747.77 of the 123
Revised Code; 124
The credit for purchases of qualifying grape production 125
property under section 5747.28 of the Revised Code; 126
The small business investment credit under section 5747.81 127
of the Revised Code; 128
The nonrefundable lead abatement credit under section 129
5747.26 of the Revised Code; 130
The opportunity zone investment credit under section 131

H. B. No. 122 Page 6
As Passed by the House
122.84 of the Revised Code; 132
The enterprise zone credits under section 5709.65 of the 133
Revised Code; 134
The research and development credit under section 5747.331 135
of the Revised Code; 136
The credit for rehabilitating a historic building under 137
section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 138
The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under 139
section 5747.83 of the Revised Code; 140
The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit 141
under section 5747.84 of the Revised Code; 142
The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 143
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 144
The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under 145
division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; 146
The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical 147
production credit under section 5747.66 of the Revised Code; 148
The refundable credit for film and theater capital 149
improvement projects under section 5747.67 of the Revised Code; 150
The refundable jobs creation credit or job retention 151
credit under division (A) of section 5747.058 of the Revised 152
Code; 153
The refundable credit for taxes paid by a qualifying 154
entity granted under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code; 155
The refundable credits for taxes paid by a qualifying 156
pass-through entity granted under division (I) of section 157
5747.08 of the Revised Code; 158

H. B. No. 122 Page 7
As Passed by the House
The refundable credit under section 5747.80 of the Revised 159
Code for losses on loans made to the Ohio venture capital 160
program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; 161
The refundable credit for rehabilitating a historic 162
building under section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 163
The refundable credit under section 5747.39 of the Revised 164
Code for taxes levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code 165
paid by an electing pass-through entity. 166
(B) For any credit, except the refundable credits 167
enumerated in this section and the credit granted under division 168
(H) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, the amount of the 169
credit for a taxable year shall not exceed the taxpayer's 170
aggregate amount of tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised 171
Code, after allowing for any other credit that precedes it in 172
the order required under this section. Any excess amount of a 173
particular credit may be carried forward if authorized under the 174
section creating that credit. Nothing in this chapter shall be 175
construed to allow a taxpayer to claim, directly or indirectly, 176
a credit more than once for a taxable year. 177
Section 2. That existing section 5747.98 of the Revised 178
Code is hereby repealed. 179
Section 3. The enactment by this act of section 5747.74 of 180
the Revised Code applies to taxable years ending on or after the 181
effective date of this section. 182